Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2387.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8320.2. Liability for wrongful death of companion animal.(a) Liability.--If the companion animal of a person is killed or sustains injuries that result in death caused by the intentional, reckless or negligent act of another or the animal of another, the owner of the companion animal may bring an action under this section. The trier of fact may find the individual causing the death, or the owner of the animal causing the death, liable for up to $15,000 in noneconomic damages as compensation for the loss of the reasonably expected society, companionship, love and affection of the companion animal, in addition to the assessed market value of the companion animal. 12345678910111213141516171819 The assessed market value of the companion animal shall include the purchase cost to the owner of the companion animal, the cost of any training the companion animal received, the cost of any veterinary care received by the companion animal as a result of the injury leading to the companion animal's death and any other pertinent fact brought before the trier of fact. The trier of fact may impose punitive damages in addition to other damages if the death occurred as a result of an intentional act.(b) Wrongful injury.--If a person's companion animal is injured by the intentional, reckless or negligent act of another or the animal of another, the trier of fact may find the individual causing the death or the owner of the animal causing the death liable for up to $5,000 in noneconomic damages, in addition to the assessed market value of the companion animal. The assessed market value shall include the purchase cost to the owner of the companion animal, the cost of any training the companion animal received, the cost of any veterinary care received by the companion animal as a result of the injury, the cost of continued veterinary care for the injury for the reasonably expected remaining life of the companion animal and any other pertinent cost brought before the trier of fact. The trier of fact may impose punitive damages in addition to other damages if the injury occurred as a result of an intentional act.(c) Effect on other actions.--The limits for noneconomic damages specified in this section shall not apply or limit damages in any causes of action for intentional infliction of emotional distress or any other civil action other than the direct and sole loss of a companion animal as authorized by this section.20260HB2387PN3208 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Inapplicability.--This section shall not apply to:(1) Any not-for-profit entity or governmental agency, or its employees, which negligently causes the death of a companion animal while acting on behalf of public health or animal welfare.(2) Any killing of a companion animal that has been or was killing or pursuing with the apparent intent to harm livestock.(e) Adjustment of dollar amount.--(1) On April 1, 2027, and each April 1 in every third calendar year thereafter, the Supreme Court shall adjust each dollar amount under this section to reflect any increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, as published by the United States Department of Labor for the three-year period ending on December 31 of the preceding year. Adjustments required by this paragraph shall be rounded to the nearest $25.(2) The Supreme Court shall transmit notice of the dollar amount to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(3) The Supreme Court may publish the notice in another manner that the court concludes would be reasonably likely to inform persons who are affected by the adjustment of the dollar amounts.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Companion animal." The following:(1) The term includes:20260HB2387PN3208 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A domestic or feral dog, domestic or feral cat, nonhuman primate, guinea pig, hamster, rabbit not raised for human food or fiber, exotic or native animal, reptile or exotic or native bird.(ii) A feral animal or an animal under the care, custody or ownership of an individual.(iii) An animal that is bought, sold, traded or bartered.(2) The term does not include an agricultural animal, game species or an animal regulated under Federal law, including a research animal."Injuries that result in death." Includes not only injuries which lead directly to the death of a companion animal, but any injury which so impairs the companion animal's quality of life or ability to perform any service role that a reasonable veterinarian would regard euthanasia as a reasonable or humane course of treatment.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2387PN3208 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718